Washington statutes.
RCW 43.167.030

Duties of authorities.

A community preservation and development authority shall have the duty to:

(1) Establish specific geographic boundaries for the authority within its bylaws based on the general geographic boundaries established in the proposal submitted and approved by the legislature;

(2) Solicit input from members of its community and develop a strategic preservation and development plan to restore and promote the health, safety, and economic well-being of the impacted community and to restore and preserve its cultural and historical identity;

(3) Include within the strategic plan a prioritized list of projects identified and supported by the community, including capital or operating components;

(4) Establish funding mechanisms to support projects and programs identified in the strategic plan including but not limited to grants and loans;

(5) Use gifts, grants, loans, and other aid from public or private entities to carry out projects identified in the strategic plan including, but not limited to, those that: (a) Enhance public safety; (b) reduce community blight; and (c) provide ongoing mitigation of the adverse effects of multiple publicly funded projects on the impacted community; and

(6) Demonstrate ongoing accountability for its actions by:

(a) Reporting to the appropriate committees of the legislature, one year after formation and every biennium thereafter, on the authority's strategic plan, activities, accomplishments, and any recommendations for statutory changes;

(b) Reporting any changes in the authority's geographic boundaries to the appropriate committees of the legislature when the legislature next convenes in regular session;

(c) Convening a local town hall meeting with its constituency on an annual basis to: (i) Report its activities and accomplishments from the previous year; (ii) present and receive input from members of the impacted community regarding its proposed strategic plan and activities for the upcoming year; and (iii) hold board member elections as necessary; and

(d) Maintaining books and records as appropriate for the conduct of its affairs.

[ 2009 c 516 s 3; 2007 c 501 s 5.]